trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>

<!--
	Special thanks to:
		Prof. George Mitrevski at Auburn University for providing his Macedonian Reverse Dictionary.
		Igor Kalkov for answering a lot of questions.
-->

<dictionary>
 <alphabet>АБВГДЃЕЖЗЅИЈКЛЉМНЊОПРСТЌУФХЦЧЏШабвгдѓежзѕијклљмнњопрстќуфхцчџшЭѐѝюABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzè</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mfn"     c="Masculine-Feminine-Neuter"/>

    <sdef n="mi"      c="Masculine (inanimate)"/>
    <sdef n="ma"      c="Masculine (animate)"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ct"      c="Count"/>
    <sdef n="apprx"   c="approximation form of numeral"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Lexical verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vaux"    c="Auxilliary verb"/>	
    <sdef n="vbhaver" c="The verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"   c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Imperfect indicative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="aor"     c="Aorist"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"   c="Adverbial participle, деепричастие"/>
    <sdef n="lp"      c="L-participle минало деятелно причастие"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/>
	<sdef n="tv"       c="Transitive"/>
	<sdef n="iv"      c="Intansitive"/>
	<sdef n="perf"       c="Perfective aspect"/>
	<sdef n="imperf"      c="Imperfective aspect"/>

    <sdef n="pref"    c="Prefix"/>
    <sdef n="part"    c="Particle"/>

    <sdef n="exp"     c="Expectative"/>
    <sdef n="sbj"     c="Subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="opt"     c="Optative"/>

    <sdef n="aff"     c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="int"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>

    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"     c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>    
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="prx"     c="Proximate"/>
    <sdef n="dst"     c="Distal"/>

    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / Plural"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral / Number"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"    c="Abbreviation"/>
 
    <sdef n="tn"      c="Tonico"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic adjective"/>
    <sdef n="pst"     c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlative"/>
    <sdef n="attr"    c="Attributive"/>
    <sdef n="pred"    c="Predicative"/>

    <sdef n="clt"     c="Clitic"/>
    <sdef n="tot"     c="Totalising"/>
    <sdef n="pro"     c="Proclitic"/>

    <sdef n="detnt"   c="Neuter determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet"  c="Pre determiner"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"     c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponym"/>
    <sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"     c="Surnames"/>

    <sdef n="al"      c="Other / Otros"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Noun noun"/>
    <sdef n="an"      c="Adjective noun"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Adjective adjective"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="prs"     c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pis"     c="Pretério imperfecto de subjunctivo"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>


    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"  c="Left question-mark"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="vbdo"/>
    <sdef n="unc"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>
	<sdef n="lquot"    c="open quotation mark"/>
	<sdef n="rquot"    c="closed quotation mark"/>

  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

  <pardef n="Нн">
    <e><p><l>Н</l><r>н</r></p></e>
    <e><i>Н</i></e>
  </pardef>


  <!-- Глаголи -->
   <pardef n="/е__vbser">
     <e>        <p>          <l>сум</l>        <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>си</l>         <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>е</l>          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>сме</l>        <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>сте</l>        <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>се</l>         <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>бев</l>        <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>беше</l>       <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>беше</l>       <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>бевме</l>      <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>бевте</l>      <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>беа</l>        <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

     <e>        <p>          <l>бил</l>          <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>била</l>         <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>било</l>         <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     <e>        <p>          <l>биле</l>         <r>е<s n="vbser"/><s n="lp"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

   </pardef>

    <e lm="е"><i></i><par n="/е__vbser"/></e>
